Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.30.541

IMPACT center—Use of research and services—Fees.

The governor, the legislature, state agencies, and the public may use the IMPACT center's trade policy research and advisory services as may be needed. The IMPACT center shall establish a schedule of fees for actual services rendered.

[ 1985 c 39 s 4; 1984 c 57 s 6.]

NOTES:

Effective date—1985 c 39: See note following RCW 28B.30.535.